Arkansas, session 2025, HB1134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 87, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact

17-87-901. Text of compact.
The Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact is enacted into law and
entered into by this state with all states legally joining therein and in the
form substantially as follows:

ADVANCED PRACTICE REGISTERED NURSE COMPACT

ARTICLE I

Findings and Declaration of Purpose

a. The party states find that:
1. The health and safety of the public are affected by the
degree of compliance with APRN licensure requirements and the effectiveness
*JMB105*
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
of enforcement activities related to state APRN licensure laws;
2. Violations of APRN licensure and other laws regulating the
practice of nursing may result in injury or harm to the public;
3. The expanded mobility of APRNs and the use of advanced
communication and intervention technologies as part of our nation’s health
care delivery system require greater coordination and cooperation among
states in the areas of APRN licensure and regulation;
4. New practice modalities and technology make compliance with
individual state APRN licensure laws difficult and complex;
5. The current system of duplicative APRN licensure for APRNs
practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and redundant for healthcare
delivery systems, payors, state licensing boards, regulators and APRNs;
6. Uniformity of APRN licensure requirements throughout the
states promotes public safety and public health benefits as well as providing
a mechanism to increase access to care.
b. The general purposes of this Compact are to:
1. Facilitate the states’ responsibility to protect the public’s
health and safety;
2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the
areas of APRN licensure and regulation, including promotion of uniform
licensure requirements;
3. Facilitate the exchange of information between party states
in the areas of APRN regulation, investigation and adverse actions;
4. Promote compliance with the laws governing APRN practice in
each jurisdiction;
5. Invest all party states with the authority to hold an APRN
accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the
patient is located at the time care is rendered through the mutual
recognition of party state privileges to practice;
6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of
APRN licenses; and
7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by APRNs who
meet uniform licensure requirements.

ARTICLE II

01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
Definitions
As used in this Compact:
a. “Advanced practice registered nurse” or “APRN” means a registered
nurse who has gained additional specialized knowledge, skills and experience
through a program of study recognized or defined by the Interstate Commission
of APRN Compact Administrators (“Commission”), and who is licensed to perform
advanced nursing practice. An advanced practice registered nurse is licensed
in an APRN role that is congruent with an APRN educational program,
certification, and Commission rules.
b. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or
criminal action permitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing
board or other authority against an APRN, including actions against an
individual’s license or multistate licensure privilege such as revocation,
suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the
licensee’s practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting an
APRN’s authorization to practice, including the issuance of a cease and
desist action.
c. “Alternative program” means a, non-disciplinary monitoring program
approved by a licensing board.
d. “APRN licensure” means the regulatory mechanism used by a party
state to grant legal authority to practice as an APRN.
e. “APRN uniform licensure requirements" means the minimum uniform
licensure, education and examination requirements set forth in Article III.b
of this Compact.
f. “Coordinated licensure information system” means an integrated
process for collecting, storing and sharing information on APRN licensure and
enforcement activities related to APRN licensure laws that is administered by
a nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by licensing boards.
g. “Current significant investigatory information” means:
1. Investigative information that a licensing board, after a
preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the
APRN to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not
groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction;
or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the APRN
represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
whether the APRN has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
h. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any
limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a
licensing board in connection with a disciplinary proceeding.
i. “Home state” means the party state that is the APRN’s primary state
of residence.
j. ”Licensing board” means a party state’s regulatory body responsible
for regulating the practice of advanced practice registered nursing.
k. “Multistate license” means an APRN license to practice as an APRN
issued by a home state licensing board that authorizes the APRN to practice
as an APRN in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege, in the
same role and population focus as the APRN is licensed in the home state.
l. ”Multistate licensure privilege” means a legal authorization
associated with an APRN multistate license that permits an APRN to practice
as an APRN in a remote state, in the same role and population focus as the
APRN is licensed in the home state.
m. “Non-controlled prescription drug” means a device or drug that is
not a controlled substance and is prohibited under state or federal law from
being dispensed without a prescription. The term includes a device or drug
that bears or is required to bear the legend “Caution: federal law prohibits
dispensing without prescription” or “prescription only” or other legend that
complies with federal law.
n. “Party state” means any state that has adopted this Compact.
o. “Population focus” means one of the six population foci of
family/individual across the lifespan, adult-gerontology, pediatrics,
neonatal, women’s health/gender-related and psych/mental health.
p. “Prescriptive authority” means the legal authority to prescribe
medications and devices as defined by party state laws.
q. “Remote state” means a party state that is not the home state.
r. “Role” means one of the four recognized roles of certified
registered nurse anesthetists (CRNA), certified nurse-midwives (CNM),
clinical nurse specialists (CNS) and certified nurse practitioners (CNP).
s. “Single-state license” means an APRN license issued by a party
state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not
include a multistate licensure privilege to practice in any other party
state.
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
t. “State” means a state, territory or possession of the United States
and the District of Columbia.
u. “State practice laws” means a party state’s laws, rules, and
regulations that govern APRN practice, define the scope of advanced nursing
practice and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline except
that prescriptive authority shall be treated in accordance with Article III.f
and g of this Compact. “State practice laws” does not include:
1. A party state’s laws, rules, and regulations requiring
supervision or collaboration with a healthcare professional, except for laws,
rules, and regulations regarding prescribing controlled substances;
2. the requirements necessary to obtain and retain an APRN
license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state.

ARTICLE III

General Provisions and Jurisdiction

a. A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal
history records of applicants for initial APRN licensure or APRN licensure by
endorsement. Such procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or
other biometric-based information by APRN applicants for the purpose of
obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record information from the Federal
Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s
criminal records.
b. Each party state shall require an applicant to satisfy the
following APRN uniform licensure requirements to obtain or retain a
multistate license in the home state:
1. Meets the home state’s qualifications for licensure or
renewal of licensure, as well as, all other applicable state laws;
2. i. Has completed an accredited graduate-level education
program that prepares the applicant for one of the four recognized roles and
population foci; or
ii. Has completed a foreign APRN education program for one
of the four recognized roles and population foci that (a) has been approved
by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable country and (b) has been
verified by an independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
licensing board-approved APRN education program;
3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign APRN education program not
taught in English or if English is not the individual’s native language,
successfully passed an English proficiency examination that includes the
components of reading, speaking, writing and listening;
4. Has successfully passed a national certification examination
that measures APRN, role and population-focused competencies and maintains
continued competence as evidenced by recertification in the role and
population focus through the national certification program;
5. Holds an active, unencumbered license as a registered nurse
and an active, unencumbered authorization to practice as an APRN;
6. Has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN® examination or
recognized predecessor, as applicable;
7. Has practiced for at least 2,080 hours as an APRN in a role
and population focus congruent with the applicant’s education and training.
For purposes of this section, practice shall not include hours obtained as
part of enrollment in an APRN education program;
8. Has submitted, in connection with an application for initial
licensure or licensure by endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data
for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that
state or, if applicable, foreign country’s criminal records;
9. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into
an agreed disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state, federal or
foreign criminal law.
10. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into
an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of
nursing as determined by factors set forth in rules adopted by the
Commission;
11. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative program;
12. Is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current
participation in an alternative program; and
13. Has a valid United States Social Security number.
c. An APRN issued a multistate license shall be licensed in an
approved role and at least one approved population focus.
d. An APRN multistate license issued by a home state to a resident in
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
that state will be recognized by each party state as authorizing the APRN to
practice as an APRN in each party state, under a multistate licensure
privilege, in the same role and population focus as the APRN is licensed in
the home state.
e. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established
by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license, except that an
individual may apply for a single-state license, instead of a multistate
license, even if otherwise qualified for the multistate license. However, the
failure of such an individual to affirmatively opt for a single state license
may result in the issuance of a multistate license.
f. Issuance of an APRN multistate license shall include prescriptive
authority for noncontrolled prescription drugs.
g. For each state in which an APRN seeks authority to prescribe
controlled substances, the APRN shall satisfy all requirements imposed by
such state in granting and/or renewing such authority.
h. An APRN issued a multistate license is authorized to assume
responsibility and accountability for patient care independent of any
supervisory or collaborative relationship. This authority may be exercised in
the home state and in any remote state in which the APRN exercises a
multistate licensure privilege.
i. All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with state due
process laws, to take adverse action against an APRN’s multistate licensure
privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation or any
other action that affects an APRN’s authorization to practice under a
multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a
party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of
the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the
coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the home state
of any such actions by remote states.
j. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Compact, an APRN
practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the
state in which the client is located at the time service is provided. APRN
practice is not limited to patient care, but shall include all advanced
nursing practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party state in
which the client is located. APRN practice in a party state under a
multistate licensure privilege will subject the APRN to the jurisdiction of
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
the licensing board, the courts, and the laws of the party state in which the
client is located at the time service is provided.
k. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Compact, this
Compact does not affect additional requirements imposed by states for
advanced practice registered nursing. However, a multistate licensure
privilege to practice registered nursing granted by a party state shall be
recognized by other party states as satisfying any state law requirement for
registered nurse licensure as a precondition for authorization to practice as
an APRN in that state.
l. Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able
to apply for a party state’s single- state APRN license as provided under the
laws of each party state. However, the single-state license granted to these
individuals will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice as
an APRN in any other party state.

ARTICLE IV

Applications for APRN Licensure in a Party State

a. Upon application for an APRN multistate license, the licensing
board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, through the coordinated
licensure information system, whether the applicant has ever held or is the
holder of a licensed practical/vocational nursing license, a registered
nursing license or an advanced practice registered nurse license issued by
any other state, whether there are any encumbrances on any license or
multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any adverse
action has been taken against any license or multistate licensure privilege
held by the applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating in
an alternative program.
b. An APRN may hold a multistate APRN license, issued by the home
state, in only one party state at a time.
c. If an APRN changes primary state of residence by moving between two
party states, the APRN must apply for APRN licensure in the new home state,
and the multistate license issued by the prior home state shall be
deactivated in accordance with applicable Commission rules.
1. The APRN may apply for licensure in advance of a change in
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
primary state of residence.

2. A multistate APRN license shall not be issued by the new home
state until the APRN provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary
state of residence to the new home state and satisfies all applicable
requirements to obtain a multistate APRN license from the new home state.
d. If an APRN changes primary state of residence by moving from a
party state to a non-party state, the APRN multistate license issued by the
prior home state will convert to a single-state license, valid only in the
former home state.

ARTICLE V

Additional Authorities Invested in Party State Licensing Boards

a. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a licensing
board shall have the authority to:
1. Take adverse action against an APRN’s multistate licensure
privilege to practice within that party state.
i. Only the home state shall have power to take adverse
action against an APRN’s license issued by the home state.
ii. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state
licensing board shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct
that occurred outside of the home state as it would if such conduct had
occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its
own state laws to determine appropriate action.
2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on an
APRN’s authority to practice within that party state.
3. Complete any pending investigations of an APRN who changes
primary state of residence during the course of such investigations. The
licensing board shall also have the authority to take appropriate action(s)
and shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the
administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The
administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly
notify the new home state of any such actions.
4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as, the production
of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a party state licensing board for the
attendance and testimony of witnesses and/or the production of evidence from
another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to that court’s practice and procedure in
considering subpoenas issued in its own proceedings. The issuing licensing
board shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees
required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses and/or
evidence are located.
5. Obtain and submit, for an APRN licensure applicant,
fingerprints or other biometric-based information to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for criminal background checks, receive the results of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal background checks
and use the results in making licensure decisions.
6. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the
affected APRN the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting
from any adverse action taken against that APRN.
7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings of another
party state, provided that the licensing board follows its own procedures for
taking such adverse action.
b. If adverse action is taken by a home state against an APRN’s
multistate licensure, the privilege to practice in all other party states
under a multistate licensure privilege shall be deactivated until all
encumbrances have been removed from the APRN’s multistate license. All home
state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against an APRN’s
multistate license shall include a statement that the APRN’s multistate
licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during the pendency of
the order.
c. Nothing in this Compact shall override a party state’s decision
that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse
action. The home state licensing board shall deactivate the multistate
licensure privilege under the multistate license of any APRN for the duration
of the APRN’s participation in an alternative program.

ARTICLE VI

01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
Coordinated Licensure Information System and Exchange of Information

a. All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure
information system of all APRNs, licensed registered nurses and licensed
practical/vocational nurses. This system will include information on the
licensure and disciplinary history of each APRN, as submitted by party
states, to assist in the coordinated administration of APRN licensure and
enforcement efforts.
b. The Commission, in consultation with the administrator of the
coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate necessary and
proper procedures for the identification, collection and exchange of
information under this Compact.
c. All licensing boards shall promptly report to the coordinated
licensure information system any adverse action, any current significant
investigative information, denials of applications (with the reasons for such
denials) and APRN participation in alternative programs known to the
licensing board regardless of whether such participation is deemed nonpublic
and/or confidential under state law.
d. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state
licensing boards contributing information to the coordinated licensure
information system may designate information that may not be shared with non-
party states or disclosed to other entities or individuals without the
express permission of the contributing state.
e. Any personally identifiable information obtained from the
coordinated licensure information system by a party state licensing board
shall not be shared with non-party states or disclosed to other entities or
individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the party state
contributing the information.
f. Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure
information system that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws
of the party state contributing the information shall be removed from the
coordinated licensure information system.
g. The Compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a
uniform data set to the Compact administrator of each other party state,
which shall include, at a minimum:
1. Identifying information;
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
2. Licensure data;
3. Information related to alternative program participation
information; and
4. Other information that may facilitate the administration of
this Compact, as determined by Commission rules.
h. The Compact administrator of a party state shall provide all
investigative documents and information requested by another party state.

ARTICLE VII

Establishment of the Interstate Commission of APRN Compact Administrators

a. The party states hereby create and establish a joint public agency
known as the Interstate Commission of APRN Compact Administrators.
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the party states.
2. Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively, in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity.
b. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each party state shall have and be limited to one
administrator. The head of the state licensing board or designee shall be the
administrator of this Compact for each party state. Any administrator may be
removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from
which the Administrator is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the Commission
shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the
vacancy exists.
2. Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) vote with
regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall
otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of
the Commission. An administrator shall vote in person or by such other means
as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for an administrator’s
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication.
3. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules
of the commission.
4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice
of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the
rulemaking provisions in Article VIII.
5. The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if
the Commission must discuss:
i. Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations
under this Compact;
ii. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel practices and
procedures;
iii. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
iv. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of
goods, services or real estate;
v. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
vi. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
vii. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy;
viii. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
ix. Disclosure of information related to any reports
prepared by or on behalf of the Commission for the purpose of investigation
of compliance with this Compact; or
x. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to
this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall certify that
the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
provision. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description
of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action
shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the
Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
c. The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators,
prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or
appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this
Compact, including but not limited to:
1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:
i. For the establishment and meetings of other committees;
and
ii. Governing any general or specific delegation of any
authority or function of the Commission.
3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting
meetings of the Commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all
meetings and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by
interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the
public’s interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information,
including trade secrets. The Commission may meet in closed session only after
a majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part.
As soon as practicable, the Commission must make public a copy of the vote to
close the meeting revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy
votes allowed;
4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable
procedures for the election of the officers of the Commission;
5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the
establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the Commission.
Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any party state,
the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of
the Commission;
6. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the
Commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
after the termination of this Compact after the payment and/or reserving of
all of its debts and obligations;
d. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and any
amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the website of the Commission;
e. The Commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance
with the bylaws; and
f. The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent
with the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws.
g. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate
implementation and administration of this Compact. The rules shall have the
force and effect of law and shall be binding in all party states;
2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any licensing board to
sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel,
including but not limited to employees of a party state or nonprofit
organizations;
5. To cooperate with other organizations that administer state
compacts related to the regulation of nursing, including but not limited to
sharing administrative or staff expenses, office space or other resources;
6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to
carry out the purposes of this Compact, and to establish the Commission’s
personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
7. To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants and gifts
of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive,
utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Commission
shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of
interest;
8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of,
or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, whether real,
personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall strive to
avoid any appearance of impropriety;
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
9. To sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or
otherwise dispose of any property, whether real, personal or mixed;
10. To establish a budget and make expenditures;
11. To borrow money;
12. To appoint committees, including advisory committees
comprised of administrators, state nursing regulators, state legislators or
their representatives, and consumer representatives, and other such
interested persons;
13. To issue advisory opinions;
14. To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
15. To adopt and use an official seal; and
16. To perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent with the state
regulation of APRN licensure and practice.
h. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing
activities.
2. The Commission may also levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each party state to cover the cost of its operations,
activities and staff in its annual budget as approved each year. The
aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a
formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule
that is binding upon all party states.
3. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior
to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any of the party states, except by, and with the
authority of, such party state.
4. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts
and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.
However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall by audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report
of the Commission.
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
i. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The administrators, officers, executive director, employees
and representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for
damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that
occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred, within the scope of Commission employment,
duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for any
damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional, willful or
wanton misconduct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any administrator, officer,
executive director, employee or representative of the Commission in any civil
action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel; and
provided further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not
result from that person’s intentional, willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
administrator, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the
Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that
person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that
occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission
did not result from the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.

ARTICLE VIII

Rulemaking
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134

a. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this Article and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules
and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or
amendment and shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this
Compact.
b. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or
special meeting of the Commission.
c. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the
Commission, and at least sixty (60) days in advance of the meeting at which
the rule will be considered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a
notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission; and
2. On the website of each licensing board or the publication in
which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.
d. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which
the rule will be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the reason
for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any
interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to
the Commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any
written comments.
e. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow
persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be
made available to the public.
f. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing
before it adopts a rule or amendment.
g. The Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the
scheduled public hearing.
1. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person
who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or
in writing. All hearings will be recorded, and a copy will be made available
upon request.
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of
the Commission at hearings required by this section.
h. If no one appears at the public hearing, the Commission may proceed
with promulgation of the proposed rule.
i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business
on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the Commission
shall consider all written and oral comments received.
j. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take
final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of
the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the
rule.
k. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for
comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided
in this Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the
rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days
after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; or
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative
rule that is established by federal law or rule.
l. The Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or
amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format,
errors in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions
shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be
subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after
posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision
results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing,
and delivered to the Commission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no
challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If
the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.

ARTICLE IX
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134

Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement

a. Oversight
1. Each party state shall enforce this Compact and take all
actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this Compact’s purposes and
intent.
2. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities or
actions of the Commission, and shall have standing to intervene in such a
proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the
Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this
Compact or promulgated rules.
b. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a party state has defaulted
in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact
or the promulgated rules, the Commission shall:
i. Provide written notice to the defaulting state and
other party states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing
the default and/or any other action to be taken by the Commission; and
ii. Provide remedial training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the
defaulting state’s membership in this Compact may be terminated upon an
affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators, and all rights,
privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact may be terminated on the
effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of
default.
3. Termination of membership in this Compact shall be imposed
only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice
of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of the
defaulting state’s licensing board, the defaulting state’s licensing board,
and each of the party states.
4. A state whose membership in this Compact has been terminated
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred
through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state
that is found to be in default or whose membership in this Compact has been
terminated, unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the
defaulting state.
6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission
by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district in which the Commission has its principal offices. The
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorneys’ fees.
c. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall attempt
to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among party states and
between party and non-party states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.
3. In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes among
party states arising under this Compact:
i. The party states may submit the issues in dispute to an
arbitration panel, which will be comprised of individuals appointed by the
Compact administrator in each of the affected party states and an individual
mutually agreed upon by the Compact administrators of all the party states
involved in the dispute.
ii. The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be
final and binding.
d. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion,
shall enforce the provisions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in
the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district in which the Commission has its principal offices against a party
state that is in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this
Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include
both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of
the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under
federal or state law.

ARTICLE X

Effective Date, Withdrawal and Amendment

a. This Compact shall come into limited effect at such time as this
Compact has been enacted into law in seven (7) party states for the sole
purpose of establishing and convening the Commission to adopt rules relating
to its operation.
b. Any state that joins this Compact subsequent to the Commission’s
initial adoption of the APRN uniform licensure requirements shall be subject
to all rules that have been previously adopted by the Commission.
c. Any party state may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same. A party state’s withdrawal shall not take effect
until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.
d. A party state’s withdrawal or termination shall not affect the
continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state’s licensing
board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring
prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination.
e. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any APRN licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement
between a party state and a non-party state that does not conflict with the
provisions of this Compact.
f. This Compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any party state until it
is enacted into the laws of all party states.
g. Representatives of non-party states to this Compact shall be
invited to participate in the activities of the Commission, on a nonvoting
basis, prior to the adoption of this Compact by all states.

ARTICLE XI
01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105

HB1134

Construction and Severability

This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes
thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any
phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is declared to be
contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States, or
if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or
circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact
and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held to
be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this Compact shall remain
in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force
and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.

17-87-902. Administration of compact — Rules.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing is the Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse Compact administrator for this state.
(b) The board may adopt rules that are consistent with the compact
necessary to implement this subchapter.
(c) The board is not required to adopt the rules of the Advanced
Practice Registered Nurse Compact Commission for those rules to be effective
in this state.













01/14/2025 12:32:59 PM JMB105